District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0042.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Safe Neighborhoods Amendment Act of 2025”.
TITLE I. THE OFFICE OF NEIGHBORHOOD ENGAGEMENT AND SAFETY
AGENCY.
Sec. 101. Office of Neighborhood Engagement and Safety Agency; establishment.
There is established as an independent government agency, the Office of Neighborhood
Engagement and Safety Agency (“ONES”), which shall be headed by a Director. Within ONES
shall be Office of the Office of Violence Prevention and Health Equity and the Office of
Neighborhood Safety and Engagement (“NEAR Offices”), established by the Neighborhood


Engagement Achieves Results Amendment Act of 2016, effective June 30, 2016 (D.C. Law 21-
125; D.C. Official Code § 7–2411 et seq.), (“NEAR Act”).
Sec. 102. Purpose, duties.
(a) The purpose of ONES shall include to coordinate and lead and direct the NEAR
Offices.
Sec. 103. Director; appointment, term.
The Director shall:
(1) Have at least 5 years of relevant experience in criminal justice and public
health-based approaches to violence, including matters affecting the deterrence of violent
criminal behavior;
(2) Be appointed by the Mayor with the advice and consent of the Council,
pursuant to section 2(a) of the Confirmation Act of 1978, effective March 3, 19790 (D.C. Law 2-
142; D.C. Official Code § 1-523.01(a)); and
(3) Serve a 6-year term.
Sec. 104. Director, duties.
The Director shall:
(1) Also be the director of the NEAR Offices;
(2) Administer the Office of Neighborhood Engagement and Safety
Administration Fund, established by section 106; and
(3) Administer the Cure the Streets Program, established pursuant to section 108f
of the Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Amendment Act of 2018, effective May 10, 2019
(D.C. Law 25-98, D.C. Official Code § 1–301.88f).


Sec 105. Office of Neighborhood Engagement and Safety Administration Fund;
establishment.
(a) There is established as a special fund the Office of Neighborhood Engagement and
Safety Administration Fund ("Fund"), which shall be administered by the Director of the Office
of Neighborhood Engagement and Safety Agency (“ONES”) in accordance with subsections (c)
and (d) of this section.
(b) Revenue from the following sources shall be deposited in the Fund:
(1) Funds appropriated by the District;
(2) Grants;
(3) Donations from the public; and
(4) Donations from private entities.
(c) Money in the Fund shall be used to fund the activities of the ONES, including:
(1) Providing stipends to eligible participants; and
(2) Appropriate overhead or administrative expenses related to the administration
ONES and the Fund.
(d)(1) The money deposited into the Fund, and interest earned, shall not revert to the
unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal
year, or at any other time.
(2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.
TITLE II. CONFORMING AMENDMENTS


Sec. 201. The Neighborhood Engagement Achieves Results Amendment Act of 2016,
effective June 30, 2016 (D.C. Law 21-125; D.C. Official Code § 7–2411 passim.), is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 101 (D.C. Official Code § 7-2411), the Office of Neighborhood Safety and
Engagement, is amended as follows:

(1) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “(“ONSE”).” and inserting
the phrase “(ONSE”)” within the Office of Neighborhood Engagement and Safety Agency,
established by section 101 of Safe Neighborhoods Amendment Act, as introduced on February
12, 2024 (Bill 25-___).”
(b) Section 104 (D.C. Official Code § 7-781), the Office of the Office of Violence
Prevention and Health Equity, is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “within the Department of
Health”.
(2) Subsection (c) is amended by striking the phrase “the Mayor” and inserting
the phrase "the Director of the Office of Neighborhood Engagement and Safety Agency” in its
place.
(c) Section 103 (D.C, Official Code 7-2413) is repealed.
(d) Section 103a (D.C. Official Code 7-2414) is amended by striking the phrase “The
Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved
100 October 21. 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), may” and inserting the
101 phrase “The Director of the Safe Neighborhoods Amendment Act , in accordance with Title I of


102 the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21. 1968 (82 Stat.
103 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), may” in its place.
104 Sec. 202. Section 108f of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia Clarification
105 and Elected Term Amendment Act of 2010., effective May 27, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-160, D.C.
106 Official Code § 1–301.88f), is repealed.
107 TITLE III. DEPUTY MAYOR FOR PUBLIC SAFETY STUDY.
108 Sec. 301. Section 3022(c) of Office of the Deputy Mayor for Public Safety and Justice
109 Establishment Act of 2011, effective September 14, 2011 (D.C. Law 19-21; D.C. Official Code §
110 1-301.191(c)), is amended as follows:
111 (a) Paragraph (6) is repealed.
112 (b) A new paragraph (8) is added to read as follows:
113 “(8) By January 1, 2025, the Office shall prepare and submit to the Mayor and Council a
114 report identifying modern recruitment tactics for the Metropolitan Police Department for new
115 recruits from the District and surrounding jurisdictions and best practices to retain senior
116 officers.”.
117 TITLE IV. POLICE HIRING PRACTICE.
118 Sec. 401. Section 202 of the Omnibus Police Reform Amendment Act of 2000 effective
119 October 4, 2000 (D.C. Law 13-160; D.C. Official Code § 5-107.01), is amended as follows:
120 (a) Subsection (e)(1) is amended to read as follows:
121 “(1) Successfully completed a High School Degree or GED;”.
122 (2) A new subsection (g) is added to read as follows:
123 “(g) An applicant shall not be deemed ineligible for appointment as a sworn member of
124 the Metropolitan Police Department based on the applicant’s credit score.”.


125 TITLE V. FIRST RESPONDER HOUSING IN DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA LOAN
126 Sec. 501. The Government Employer-Assisted Housing Amendment Act of 1999
127 effective May 9, 2000 (D.C. Law 13-96; D.C. Official Code § 42-2501 et seq.), is amended as
128 follows:
129 (a) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 42-2502) is amended as follows:
130 (1) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the word “and”.
131 (2) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “;
132 and” in its place.
133 (3) A new paragraph (5) is added to read as follows:
134 “(5) A interest free loan of up to $202,000 pursuant to section 6b.”.
135 (b) Section 6a (D.C. Official Code § 42-2505.01) is amended as follows:
136 (1) The section heading is amended to read as follows:
137 “Sec. 6a. Educator grant.”.
138 (2) Strike the phrase “first-responder or” wherever it appears.
139 (c) A new section 6b is added as follows:
140 “Sec. 6b. First-responder housing.
141 “(a)(1) In addition to the assistance provided in sections 5(b-1) and 6, the Department
142 shall make available a deferred interest-free loan of up to $202,000 to provide financial
143 assistance for the purchase of a housing unit to each first-responder who is a Participant.
144 “(2) The deferred interest free loan shall be granted to equal up to 20 percent of
145 the down cost of the housing unit.
146 “(b) In order to receive the financial assistance provided by this section, for the purchase
147 of a housing unit under this section, a Participant must agree to a 15-year service obligation,
148 which shall begin at the date of settlement on the purchase of the housing unit, or, if the
149 Participant is not yet a District employee on the date of settlement, on the Participant’s first day
150 of employment with the District.


151 “(c) The deferred interest free loan will be forgiven at a rate of 5% for each year of
152 service obligation for the first 10 years of the loan. After the first 10 years it will be forgiven at a
153 rate of 10% for the final 5 years of the service obligation.
154 “(d) The loan may be transferred once to the deed of a new housing unit so long as the
155 new housing unit is located within the District of Columbia.
156 “(e) The deferred interest free loan shall convert into a loan with interest to be repaid by
157 the Participant if:
158 “(1) Within 5 years after the date of settlement on the purchase of the housing
159 unit, the housing unit is sold, transferred, or ceases to be the principal residence of the
160 Participant; or
161 “(2) The first-responder Participant does not complete the 15-year service
162 obligation required by subsection (b) of this section.
163 “(f) For the purposes of this section, the term "service obligation" means employment as
164 a first-responder.”.
165 TITLE 6. GENERAL PROVISIONS
166 Sec. 601. Fiscal impact statement.
167 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
168 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
169 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
170 Sec. 602. Effective date.
171 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
172 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
173 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
174 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).